Washington statutes.
RCW 9.100.070

Request for temporary custody—Notice to prisoner and governor—Advising prisoner of rights.

In order to implement Article IV(a) of the agreement on detainers, and in furtherance of its purposes, the appropriate authorities having custody of the prisoner shall, promptly upon receipt of the officer's written request, notify the prisoner and the governor in writing that a request for temporary custody has been made and such notification shall describe the source and contents of said request. The authorities having custody of the prisoner shall also advise him or her in writing of his or her rights to counsel, to make representations to the governor within thirty days, and to contest the legality of his or her delivery.

[ 2011 c 336 s 346; 1967 c 34 s 7.]